Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 17. Foreign Corporations.

§ 13.1-757.
Authority to transact business required.

A foreign corporation may not transact business in the Commonwealth until it obtains a certificate of authority from the Commission.

The following activities, among others, do not constitute transacting business within the meaning of subsection A:

Maintaining, defending, mediating, arbitrating, or settling any proceeding;

Holding meetings of the board of directors or shareholders or carrying on other activities concerning internal corporate affairs;

Maintaining accounts in financial institutions;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of the corporation’s own securities or maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those securities;

Selling through independent contractors;

Soliciting or obtaining orders, by any means, if the orders require acceptance outside the Commonwealth before they become contracts;

Creating or acquiring indebtedness, deeds of trust, or security interests in property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing deeds of trust or security interests in property securing the debts, and holding, protecting, or maintaining property so acquired;

Owning, protecting, and maintaining property;

Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within 30 consecutive days and that is not one in the course of similar transactions;

For a period of less than 90 consecutive days, producing, directing, filming, crewing, or acting in motion picture feature films, television series, or commercials, or promotional films that are sent outside of the Commonwealth for processing, editing, marketing, and distribution;

Serving, without more, as a general partner of, or as a partner in a partnership which is a general partner of, a domestic or foreign limited partnership that does not otherwise transact business in the Commonwealth; or

Transacting business in interstate commerce.

The list of activities in subsection B is not exhaustive.

This section does not apply in determining the contacts or activities that may subject a foreign corporation to service of process, taxation, or regulation under the laws of the Commonwealth other than this chapter.

The term “transacting business” as used in this section shall have no effect on personal jurisdiction under §

8.01-328.1

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-102 to 13.1-102.2; 1956, c. 428; 1962, c. 239; 1980, c. 630; 1985, c. 522; 1990, c. 428; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

Cross references.

As to registration and authority to transact business for financial institutions, see §

6.2-702

. As to filing requirements for interstate branches of out-of-state banks, see Article 6 (§

6.2-836

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 6.2.

As to additional filing requirements for out-of-state banks, see §

6.2-840

.

As to constitutional authority, see Va. Const., Art. IX, § 5.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in subsection A and subdivision B 12; deleted “of this section” following “subsection A” in subsection B; substituted “that does” for “which does” in subdivision B 12; deleted “of this section” following “subsection B” in subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote this Code section.

Law Review.

For article, “The New Virginia Stock Corporation Act: A Primer,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 67 (1985).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, § 290; 15 M.J. Railroads, § 3.

§ 13.1-758.
Consequences of transacting business without authority.

A foreign corporation transacting business in the Commonwealth without a certificate of authority may not maintain a proceeding in any court in the Commonwealth until it obtains a certificate of authority.

The successor to a foreign corporation that transacted business in the Commonwealth without a certificate of authority and the assignee of a cause of action arising out of that business may not maintain a proceeding based on that cause of action in any court in the Commonwealth until the foreign corporation or its successor obtains a certificate of authority.

A court may stay a proceeding commenced by a foreign corporation, its successor, or assignee until it determines whether the foreign corporation or its successor requires a certificate of authority. If it so determines, the court shall further stay the proceeding until the foreign corporation or its successor obtains the certificate.

If a foreign corporation transacts business in the Commonwealth without a certificate of authority, each officer, director, and employee who does any of such business in the Commonwealth knowing that a certificate of authority is required shall be liable for a penalty of not less than $500 and not more than $5,000. Any such penalty may be imposed by the Commission or by any court in the Commonwealth before which an action against the corporation may lie, after the corporation and the individual have been given notice and an opportunity to be heard.

Notwithstanding subsections A and B, the failure of a foreign corporation to obtain a certificate of authority does not impair the validity of its corporate acts or prevent it from defending any proceeding in the Commonwealth.

Suits, actions, and proceedings may be begun against a foreign corporation that transacts business in the Commonwealth without a certificate of authority by serving process on any director, officer, or agent of the corporation doing such business, or, if none can be found, on the clerk of the Commission or on the corporation in any other manner permitted by law. If any foreign corporation transacts business in the Commonwealth without a certificate of authority, it shall by transacting such business be deemed to have thereby appointed the clerk of the Commission as an agent for service of process upon the foreign corporation. Service upon the clerk shall be made in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-218, 13.1-119; 1956, c. 428; 1981, c. 320; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 571; 1990, c. 325; 1991, c. 672; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

Cross references.

As to unlicensed public adjusters, see Article 3 (§

38.2-812

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 38.2.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout; deleted “of this section” following “B” in subsection E; in subsection F, inserted “or on the corporation in any other manner permitted by law” in the first sentence and in the third sentence, inserted “upon the clerk” and deleted “on the clerk” following “made”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection F, substituted “as an agent” for “its attorney,” and inserted “upon the foreign corporation” following “of process.”

Law Review.

For 1987 survey of Virginia business and corporate law, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 645 (1987).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Attachment and Garnishment, § 11; 4B M.J. Corporations, §§ 290, 297; 11B M.J. Jurisdiction, § 15.

§ 13.1-759.
Application for certificate of authority.

To obtain a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth, a foreign corporation shall deliver an application to the Commission. The application shall be made on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission. The application shall be signed in the name of the foreign corporation and set forth:

The name of the foreign corporation, and if the foreign corporation is prevented by §

13.1-762

from using its name in the Commonwealth, a designated name that satisfies the requirements of subsection B of §

13.1-762

;

The foreign corporation’s jurisdiction of formation, and if the foreign corporation was previously authorized or registered to transact business in the Commonwealth as a foreign corporation, limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership, or registered limited liability partnership, with respect to every such prior authorization or registration, (i) the name of the entity; (ii) the entity type; (iii) the state or other jurisdiction of incorporation, organization, or formation; and (iv) the entity identification number issued to it by the Commission;

The foreign corporation’s original date of incorporation, organization, or formation as an entity and its period of duration;

The street address of the foreign corporation’s principal office;

The address of the proposed registered office of the foreign corporation in the Commonwealth (including both (i) the post office address with street and number, if any, and (ii) the name of the county or city in which it is located) and the name of its proposed registered agent in the Commonwealth at such address and that the registered agent is either (a) an individual who is a resident of Virginia and either an officer or director of the corporation or a member of the Virginia State Bar or (b) a domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company, or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth, the business office of which is identical with the registered office;

The names and business addresses of the foreign corporation’s directors and principal officers; and

The number of shares the foreign corporation is authorized to issue, itemized by class.

The foreign corporation shall deliver with the completed application a copy of its articles of incorporation and all amendments and corrections thereto duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in its jurisdiction of formation.

A foreign corporation is not precluded from receiving a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth because of any difference between the law of the foreign corporation’s jurisdiction of formation and the law of the Commonwealth.

If the Commission finds that the application complies with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-106, 13.1-107; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 1994, c. 348; 2001, cc. 517, 541; 2002, c. 497; 2004, c. 274; 2015, c. 623; 2019, c. 734; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 517 and 541 are identical, and in subdivision A 5, substituted “agent is either (a) an individual who is a resident of Virginia and either an officer” for “agent is (a) a resident of Virginia and an officer” and substituted “a domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation limited liability company, or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth” for “a professional corporation or professional, limited liability company registered under the provisions of §

54.1-3902

.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 497 inserted “and if the corporation is prevented by §

13.1-762

from using its own name in this Commonwealth, a designated name that satisfies the requirements of subsection B of §

13.1-762

” at the end of subdivision A 1.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 274 substituted “other jurisdiction” for “country” and added the language beginning “and if the corporation
was previously authorized” at the end in subdivision A 2; substituted “other jurisdiction” for “country” in subsection B; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 deleted “own” preceding “name in the Commonwealth” in subdivision A 1; inserted “principal” in subdivision A 6; and deleted “classes and series, if any, within a” preceding “class” in subdivision A 7.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote subsection A, which read: “A foreign corporation may apply to the Commission for a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth. The application shall be made on forms prescribed and furnished by the Commission. The application shall set forth”; in subdivision A 1, inserted “foreign” preceding “corporation” twice; in subdivision A 2, substituted “The foreign corporation’s jurisdiction of formation, and if the foreign corporation” for “The name of the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it is incorporated, and if the corporation”; in subdivision A 3, added “of the foreign corporation” at the end; rewrote subdivision A 6, which read: “The names and usual business addresses of the current directors and principal officers of the foreign corporation; and; in subdivision A 7, inserted ”foreign“ following ”shares the“; in subsection B, substituted ”in its jurisdiction of formation“ for ”the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it is incorporated“; added subsection C; and redesignated former subsection C as D.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote subdivision A 3, which read: “The date of incorporation and period of duration of the foreign corporation; and inserted “and corrections” in subsection B. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 499 (2001).

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

§ 13.1-760.
Amended certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth shall obtain an amended certificate of authority from the Commission if it:

Changes its corporate name in the jurisdiction of its formation;

Changes its jurisdiction of formation; or

Abandons or changes the designated name adopted by the foreign corporation for use in the Commonwealth pursuant to subsection B of §

13.1-762

.

The requirements of §

13.1-759

for obtaining an original certificate of authority apply to obtaining an amended certificate under this section.

Whenever the articles of incorporation of a foreign corporation that is authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth are amended, within 30 days after the amendment becomes effective, the foreign corporation shall file with the Commission a copy of such amendment duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in its jurisdiction of formation.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-112, 13.1-113; 1956, c. 428; 1976, c. 159; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 571; 1987, c. 431; 2015, c. 623; 2019, c. 734.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623, in subsection A, added the subdivision designations, substituted “other jurisdiction” for “country” in subdivision A 1 and added subdivision A 2; in subsection C, substituted “transact business in the Commonwealth” for “do business in Virginia” and substituted “other jurisdiction” for “country”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, added “if it” at the end; rewrote subdivision A 1, which read: “If it changes its corporate name or the state or other jurisdiction of its incorporation; or”; added subdivision A 2; redesignated former subdivision A 2 as 3; in subdivision A 3, inserted “foreign” preceding “corporation”; in subsection C, substituted “its jurisdiction of formation” for “the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it is incorporated”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-761.
Effect of certificate of authority.

A certificate of authority authorizes the foreign corporation to transact business in the Commonwealth subject, however, to the right of the Commonwealth to revoke the certificate as provided in this chapter.

A foreign corporation holding a valid certificate of authority shall have no greater rights and privileges than a domestic corporation. The certificate of authority shall not be deemed to authorize the foreign corporation to exercise any of its corporate powers or purposes that a foreign corporation is forbidden by law to exercise in the Commonwealth.

This chapter does not authorize the Commonwealth to regulate the organization or internal affairs of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-102, 13.1-103, 13.1-108; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, deleted “to which it is issued” following “corporation” in subsection A.

§ 13.1-762.
Corporate name of foreign corporation.

No certificate of authority shall be issued to a foreign corporation unless the corporate name of such foreign corporation satisfies the requirements of §

13.1-630

.

If the corporate name of a foreign corporation does not satisfy the requirements of §

13.1-630

, to obtain or maintain a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth:

The foreign corporation may use a designated name that adds the word “corporation,” “incorporated,” “company,” or “limited,” or the abbreviation “corp.,” “inc.,” “co.,” or “ltd.,” to its corporate name or, if it is a professional corporation, the words “professional corporation” or “a professional corporation” or the initials “P.C.” or “PC” at the end of its corporate name, if it informs the Commission of the designated name; or

If its real name is unavailable, the foreign corporation may use a designated name that is available, and that satisfies the requirements of §

13.1-630

, if it informs the Commission of the designated name.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-104, 13.1-105, 13.1-114; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 1986, cc. 232, 571; 2003, c. 592; 2005, cc. 379, 765; 2012, c. 63; 2015, c. 623.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 592, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only, (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to the effective date of this act [October 1, 2004] with respect to the name of a corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership, and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to the effective date of this act to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

Acts 2012, c. 63, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to the effective date of this act with respect to the name of a corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the propriety of its name prior to the effective date of this act to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 592, effective October 1, 2004, in subdivision A 3, rewrote paragraphs a, c and d and added paragraphs e to l; and added subsection E.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 379, effective March 21, 2005, in subsection E, added “designation,” substituted “§

13.1-544.1

, subsection A of §

13.1-630

, subsection A of §

13.1-1012

, §

13.1-1104

, subdivision 1 of §

50-73.2

, and subdivision A 2 of §

50-73.78

” for “this chapter, Chapter 7 (§

13.1-542

et seq.), 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.), 13 (§

13.1-1100

et seq.), and 14 (§

13.1-1200

et seq.) of this title, and Chapter 2.1 (§

50-73.1

et seq.) of Title 50,” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout; deleted “of this section” following “subsection C” in subdivision A 3; deleted “of this section” following “subsection A” in subsection B; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 63 rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 in subdivision B 1, substituted “use a designated name that adds” for “add” and “or, if it is a professional corporation, the words “professional corporation” or “a professional corporation” or the initials “P.C.” or “PC” at the end of its corporate name, if it informs the Commission of the designated name” for “for use in the Commonwealth.”

§ 13.1-763.
Registered office and registered agent of foreign corporation.

Each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth shall continuously maintain in the Commonwealth:

A registered office, which may be the same as any of its places of business; and

A registered agent, who shall be:

An individual who is a resident of Virginia and either an officer or director of the corporation or a member of the Virginia State Bar, and whose business office is identical with the registered office; or

A domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth, the business office of which is identical with the registered office; provided such a registered agent (i) shall not be its own registered agent and (ii) shall designate by instrument in writing, acknowledged before a notary public, one or more natural persons at the office of the registered agent upon whom any process, notice or demand may be served and shall continuously maintain at least one such person at that office. Whenever any such person accepts service, a photographic copy of such instrument shall be attached to the return.

The sole duty of the registered agent is to forward to the foreign corporation at its last known address any process, notice, or demand that is served on the registered agent.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-109; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 1994, c. 348; 2000, c. 162; 2001, cc. 517, 541; 2019, c. 734.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 162, in subdivision A 2 b, deleted “or” following “professional corporation,” inserted “or registered limited liability partnership” preceding “registered” and inserted “with the Virginia State Bar” thereafter.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 517 and 541, are identical, and in the introductory language of subdivision A 2, substituted “who shall be” for “which agent shall be”; in subdivision A 2 a, inserted “An individual who is,” substituted “and either an officer” for “who is an officer,” and substituted “business office” for “business address”; in subdivision A 2 b, substituted “A domestic foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company” for “A professional corporation, professional limited liability company,” substituted “authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth” for “registered with the Virginia State Bar under the provisions of §

54.1-3902

” and added the language beginning “provided such a registered agent . . .”; and in subsection B, substituted “any process, notice or demand” for “any notice.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection B, inserted “foreign” preceding “corporation”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 499 (2001).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Principal office.” —

For purposes of subdivision (2) of § 55-58.1, “principal office” may be defined according to the definition of this term provided in Title 13.1. A corporation’s registered office does not satisfy the requirements of subdivision (2) of § 55-58.1 unless such office also meets the definition of “principal office.” See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable J. Chapman Petersen, Member, Senate of Virginia, 11-053,
(9/14/2012).

§ 13.1-764.
Change of registered office or registered agent of a foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth may change its registered office or registered agent, or both, upon filing with the Commission a statement of change on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission that sets forth:

The name of the foreign corporation;

The address of its current registered office;

If the current registered office is to be changed, the post office address, including the street and number, if any, of the new registered office, and the name of the city or county in which it is to be located;

The name of its current registered agent;

If the current registered agent is to be changed, the name of the new registered agent; and

That after the change or changes are made, the corporation will be in compliance with the requirements of §

13.1-763

.

A statement of change shall be filed with the Commission by a foreign corporation if its registered agent dies, resigns, or ceases to satisfy the requirements of §

13.1-763

.

A foreign corporation’s registered agent may sign a statement as required above if (i) the business address of the registered agent changes to another post office address within the Commonwealth, (ii) the name of the county or city in which the registered office is located changes or is incorrect on the Commission’s records, or (iii) the name of the registered agent has been legally changed. A foreign corporation’s new registered agent may sign and submit for filing a statement as required above if (a) the former registered agent is a business entity that has been merged into the new registered agent, (b) the instrument of merger is on record with the Commission, and (c) the new registered agent is an entity that is qualified to serve as a registered agent pursuant to §

13.1-763

. In either instance, the registered agent or surviving entity shall forthwith file a statement as required above, which shall recite that a copy of the statement shall be mailed to the principal office of the foreign corporation on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed with the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-110; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 622; 2003, c. 597; 2010, c. 434; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence of subsection C, inserted clause (ii) and redesignated former clause (ii) as clause (iii), and made a stylistic change.

§ 13.1-765.
Resignation of registered agent of foreign corporation.

A registered agent may resign as agent for the foreign corporation by signing and filing with the Commission a statement of resignation stating (i) the name of the foreign corporation, (ii) the name of the agent, and (iii) that the agent resigns from serving as registered agent for the foreign corporation. The statement of resignation shall be accompanied by a certification that the registered agent will have a copy of the statement mailed to the principal office of the foreign corporation by certified mail on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed. When the statement of resignation takes effect, the registered office is also discontinued.

A statement of resignation takes effect on the earlier of (i) 12:01 a.m. on the thirty-first day after the date on which the statement was filed with the Commission or (ii) the date on which a statement of change to appoint a registered agent is filed, in accordance with §

13.1-764

, with the Commission.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2010, c. 434; 2019, c. 734; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Cross references.

For the effect failing to file a statement of change, following a resignation under this section, can have on the corporation’s certificate of authority, see §

13.1-768

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subsection A, substituted “the” for “his,” “a” for “his” and “the registered agent” for “he.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 434, in subsection A, substituted “shall mail” for “has mailed” and inserted “on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, inserted “foreign” preceding “corporation.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section, which read: “A. The registered agent of a foreign corporation may resign the agency appointment by signing and filing with the Commission a statement of resignation accompanied by a certification that the registered agent shall mail a copy thereof to the principal office of the foreign corporation by certified mail on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed. The statement of resignation may include a statement that the registered office is also discontinued.

“B. The agency appointment is terminated, and the registered office discontinued if so provided, on the thirty-first day after the date on which the statement was filed.” For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-766.
Service of process on foreign corporation.

The registered agent of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth shall be an agent of the foreign corporation upon whom any process, notice, order, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the corporation may be served. The registered agent may by instrument in writing, acknowledged before a notary public, designate a natural person or persons in the office of the registered agent upon whom any such process, notice, order, or demand may be served. Whenever any such person accepts service of process, a photographic copy of such instrument shall be attached to the return.

Whenever a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in the Commonwealth, or whenever its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, then the clerk of the Commission shall be an agent of the foreign corporation upon whom service may be made in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

Nothing in this section shall limit or affect the right to serve any process, notice, order, or demand, required or permitted by law to be served upon a foreign corporation in any other manner now or hereafter permitted by law.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-214 to 13-217, 13.1-111; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 1986, cc. 571, 622; 1991, c. 672; 2001, cc. 517, 541; 2019, c. 734.

Cross references.

See also §

8.01-301

.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 517 and 541 are identical, and inserted “natural” preceding “person or persons” in the second sentence of subsection A.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 inserted “foreign” preceding “corporation” throughout; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Process, § 27.

§ 13.1-766.1.
Merger of foreign corporation authorized to transact business in Commonwealth.

Whenever a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth is a party to a merger permitted by the laws of its jurisdiction of formation, and such foreign corporation is the surviving entity of the merger, it shall, within 30 days after such merger becomes effective, file with the Commission a copy of the instrument of merger duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in its jurisdiction of formation; however, the filing shall not be required when a foreign corporation merges with a domestic corporation or eligible entity, the foreign corporation’s articles of incorporation are not amended by said merger, and the articles or statement of merger filed on behalf of the domestic corporation or eligible entity pursuant to §

13.1-720

,

13.1-1072

,

13.1-1261

,

50-73.48:3

, or

50-73.131

contains a statement that the participation of the foreign corporation was duly authorized as required by its organic law.

Whenever a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth is a party to a merger permitted by the laws of its jurisdiction of formation, and such corporation is not the surviving entity of the merger or, whenever such a foreign corporation is a party to a consolidation so permitted, the surviving or resulting foreign corporation or eligible entity, if there is one, shall, if not continuing to transact business in the Commonwealth, within 30 days after such merger or consolidation becomes effective, deliver to the Commission a copy of the instrument of merger or consolidation duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in the foreign corporation’s jurisdiction of formation, and comply in behalf of the predecessor corporation with the provisions of §

13.1-767

. However, if the surviving or resulting foreign corporation or eligible entity is to continue to transact business in the Commonwealth and has not obtained a certificate of authority or a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth then, within such 30 days, it shall deliver to the Commission an application for a certificate of authority or a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth, pursuant to and in compliance with §

13.1-759

,

13.1-921

,

13.1-1052

,

13.1-1242

,

50-73.54

, or

50-73.138

, as applicable.

Upon the merger or consolidation of a foreign corporation with one or more foreign corporations or eligible entities, all property in the Commonwealth owned by any of the foreign corporations or eligible entities shall pass to the surviving or resulting foreign corporation or eligible entity except as otherwise provided by the laws of its jurisdiction of formation, but only from and after the time when a duly authenticated copy of the instrument of merger or consolidation is filed with the Commission.

History.

1986, c. 571; 1990, c. 283; 1992, c. 575; 1997, c. 190; 2004, c. 274; 2006, c. 663; 2015, c. 623; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, deleted “or eligible entity” preceding “was duly” near the end of subsection A.

§ 13.1-766.2.
Conversion of foreign corporation authorized to transact business in Commonwealth.

Whenever a foreign corporation that is authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth converts to another type of entity, the surviving or resulting entity shall, within 30 days after such conversion becomes effective, file with the Commission a copy of the instrument of conversion duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws such conversion was effected; and

If the surviving or resulting entity is not continuing to transact business in the Commonwealth or is not a foreign limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership, or registered limited liability partnership, then, within 30 days after such conversion, it shall comply on behalf of the predecessor corporation with the provisions of §

13.1-767

; or

If the surviving or resulting entity is a foreign limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership, or registered limited liability partnership and is to continue to transact business in the Commonwealth, then, within such 30 days, it shall deliver to the Commission an application for a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth or, in the case of a foreign registered limited liability partnership, a statement of registration.

Upon the conversion of a foreign corporation that is authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth, all property in the Commonwealth owned by the foreign corporation shall pass to the surviving or resulting entity except as otherwise provided by the laws of its jurisdiction of formation, but only from and after the time when a duly authenticated copy of the instrument of conversion is filed with the Commission.

History.

2004, c. 274; 2019, c. 734.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 734, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That until July 1, 2021, the term ‘conversion,’ when used in any provision of the first enactment of this act, shall be construed to mean ‘entity conversion.’ ”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 deleted “entity” preceding “conversion” throughout; and in subsection B, substituted “of its jurisdiction of formation” for “of the state or other jurisdiction by which it is governed.”